src/fst/orthography/inituppercase.regex
a (->) A,
â (->) Â,
ā (->) Ā,
b (->) B,
c (->) C,
d (->) D,
e (->) E,
ê (->) Ê,
ē (->) Ē,
f (->) F,
g (->) G,
h (->) H,
i (->) I,
î (->) Î,
ī (->) Ī,
j (->) J,
k (->) K,
l (->) L,
m (->) M,
n (->) N,
o (->) O,
ô (->) Ô,
ō (->) Ō,
p (->) P,
q (->) Q,
r (->) R,
s (->) S,
t (->) T,
u (->) U,
v (->) V,
w (->) W,
x (->) X,
y (->) Y,
z (->) Z || .#. _ ;
